test/src/gt-norm-yamls/to_be_checked/V-lex-der-kiessad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kiessâđ: # not checked


    kiessâđ+V+Inf: kiessâđ
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: kiessuđ
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiessuum
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kiessuuh
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiässoo
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kiässojeen
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kiessuuvettee
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kiessuv
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kiessup
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kiessuuvetteđ
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kiässojeh
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kiässojim
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kiässojih
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kiessui
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kiessuim
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kiessuid
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kiessuin
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kiessuim
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kiessuid
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kiässojii
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kiessuuččim
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: kiessuuččih
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kiessuuččij
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: kiessuuččáim
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: kiessuuččáid
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: kiessuuččáin
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: kiessuuččijm
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: kiessuuččijd
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: kiessuuččii
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kiessuužeem
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: kiessuužeeh
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kiessuš
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: kiessuužeen
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: kiessušvettee
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: kiessuužává
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: kiessuužep
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: kiessušvetteđ
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: kiessuužeh
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kiessuu
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kiessum
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kiessuuččii
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kiessuužii
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: kiässojeijee
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: kiässojijjee
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: kiessum
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: kiessum
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: kiessuumin
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: kiessuumist
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: kiessuumân
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: kiessuudijn
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: kiessuuhennáá
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: kiessuuhinnáá
    kiessâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: kiessuuhánnáá
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiesâdâm
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kiesâdah
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiesâd
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kiesâdeen
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kiesâdvettee
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kiesâdává
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kiesâdeh
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kiesâd
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kiesâdim
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kiesâdij
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kiesâdii
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kiesâdiččim
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kiesâdičij
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kiesâdižžeem
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kiesâdiš
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kiesâd
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kiesâdâm
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kiesâdižžii
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: kiesâdâm
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: kiesâdhennáá
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: kiesâdhinnáá
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: kiesâdhánnáá
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: kiesâdem
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: kiesâdmân
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: kiesâdmin
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: kiesâdmist
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: kiesâddijn
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: kiesâddijnân
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: kiesâddijnâd
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: kiesâddijnis
    kiessâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: kiesâddijn
    kiessâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiesâstâm
    kiessâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiesâttâm
    kiessâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiesâškuáđám
    kiessâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiesâlâm
    kiessâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiessâl
    kiessâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kiesâleen
    kiessâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kiesâleh
    kiessâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kiessâl
    kiessâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kiesâlim
    kiessâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kiesâlij
    kiessâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kiesâlii

  Verb - ciellâđ: #: copied from V-3lex_cielattid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Inf: cielâttiđ
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cielâttâm
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: cielâttah
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cielât
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: cielâtteen
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: cielâtvettee
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: cielâttává
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: cielâttep
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: cielâtvetteđ
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: cielâtteh
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: cielâttim
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: cielâttih
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: cielâttij
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: cielâttáim
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: cielâttáid
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: cielâttáin
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: cielâttijm
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: cielâttijd
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: cielâttii
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: cielâttiččim
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: cielâttiččih
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: cielâttičij
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: cielâttiččijm
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: cielâttiččijd
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: cielâttiččijn
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: cielâttiččijm
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: cielâttiččijd
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: cielâttiččii
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: cielâttižžeem
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: cielâttižžeeh
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: cielâttiš
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: cielâttižžeen
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: cielâttišvettee
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: cielâttižává
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: cielâttižžep
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: cielâttišvetteđ
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: cielâttižeh
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Imprt+Sg2: cielât
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Imprt+Sg3: cielâttus
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Imprt+Du1: cielâttoon
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Imprt+Du2: cielâttee
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Imprt+Du3: cielâttus
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Imprt+Pl1: cielâttop
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Imprt+Pl2: cielâttiđ
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Imprt+Pl3: cielâttus
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: cielât
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: cielâttâm
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: cielâttiččii
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: cielâttižžii
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+PrsPrc: [cielâtteijee, cielâttijjee]
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+PrfPrc: cielâttâm
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Actio+Nom: cielâttem
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Actio+Ess: cielâtmin
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Actio+Loc: cielâtmist
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Actio+Ill: cielâtmân
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Actio+Com: cielâtdijn
    ciellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+VAbess: cielâthánnáá
